src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NI+Dim+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aansim EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:ensim EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:aansiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:ensiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aansiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aansiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:ensiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:ensiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:aansiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:ensiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aansibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aansibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ensibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ensibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aansiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:ensiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aansiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:ensiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aansiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:ensiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aansiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:ensiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aansiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3PlObvPoss:ensiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aansiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3PlProxPoss:ensiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aansiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3SgObvPoss:ensiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aans EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3SgProxPoss:ens EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc+3PlObvPoss:aaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc+3PlProxPoss:aawaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc+3SgObvPoss:aaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc+3SgProxPoss:aang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:aanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:aawaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:aanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:aakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:aashining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:aashiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:aashining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:aashing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:aashinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:aashiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:aashinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:aashikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl+3PlObvPoss:aashiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aashiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl+3SgObvPoss:aashiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aashan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aashiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aashiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aashiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aash EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3PlObvPoss:aaniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aawaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3SgObvPoss:aaniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3SgProxPoss:an EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Loc+3PlObvPoss:aamining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Loc+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Loc+3SgObvPoss:aamining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Loc+3SgProxPoss:aaming EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:aaminikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:aaminikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:aamikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:aamishining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:aamishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:aamishining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:aamishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:aamishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:aamishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:aamishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:aamishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Pl+3PlObvPoss:aamishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aamishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Pl+3SgObvPoss:aamishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aamishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aamishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aamishiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aamishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aamish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pl+3PlObvPoss:aaminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pl+3SgObvPoss:aaminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aaman EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:aaminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:aaminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aamibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aamibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aaminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aaminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aamiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aaminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aamiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aaminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aam EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:aaniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aawaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:aawaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:aaniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:aabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aaniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aawaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aaniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:aaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlObvPoss:aaniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlProxPoss:aawaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgObvPoss:aaniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgProxPoss:a1 EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_ShortCy                                      !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary
0:%>%> NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_ShortCy                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_ShortCy                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Stems
abaagamide-nibi:abaagamide-niby2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
abwi:abwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
aki:aky2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
anishinaabewaki:anishinaabewaky2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
anwi:anwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
azhashki:azhashky2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
babigwanwi:babigwanwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
bingwi:bingwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
dakigami-nibi:dakigami-niby2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
gaapizigewabwi:gaapizigewabwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
gichi-mookomaan-aki:gichi-mookomaan-aky2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
gichigami:gichigamy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
gizhaagamide-nibi:gizhaagamide-niby2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
ishkode-bingwi:ishkode-bingwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
jiibayaki:jiibayaky2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
mini:miny2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
minisi:minisy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
miskwi:miskwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
nibi:niby2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
waabashkiki:waabashkiky2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
waabiziiwanwi:waabiziiwanwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
wanii'igewaki:wanii'igewaky2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
zhaaganaashiiwaki:zhaaganaashiiwaky2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
zhiishiibanwi:zhiishiibanwy2 NI_Class=NI_ShortCy_Boundary ;
